Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Part A
General Provisions

§ 56-102. Principles of prospective rates and payment. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 164, § 2, effective July 1, 2011.

§ 56-103. Prospective base rates by class of facilities. [Repealed.]

§ 56-104. Recapture of depreciation.

Where depreciable assets that were reimbursed based on cost and were used in the medicaid program subsequent to January 1, 1982, and for which depreciation has been reimbursed by the director, are sold for an amount in excess of their net book value, depreciation so reimbursed shall be recaptured from the buyer of the facility in an amount equal to reimbursed depreciation or gain on the sale, whichever is less. Depreciation shall be recaptured in full if a sale of a depreciated facility takes place within the first five (5) years of seller’s ownership after January 1, 1982.

Depreciation shall be recaptured by the director from the buyer of the facility over a period of time not to exceed five (5) years from the date of sale, with not less than one-fifth (1/5) of the total amount being recaptured for each year after such date.

Leases of facilities entered into on or after the effective date of this subsection shall be reimbursed in the same manner as an owned asset, with recapture of depreciation being effected against the buyer of the facility in the case where the facility’s assets are sold by the lessor of the facility. Leases in existence prior to the effective date of this subsection shall be reimbursed at the rate established prior to such date for each such lease. Renegotiated leases shall be reimbursed at established rates, plus a reasonable annual increase.

§ 56-105 — 56-107. Prospective payments — Adjustment— Audit and settlement. [Repealed.]

§ 56-108. Property reimbursement — Facilities will be paid a property rental rate, property taxes and reasonable property insurance.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to hospital-based facilities which are subject to the provisions of section 56-120, Idaho Code, or to intermediate care facilities for people with intellectual disabilities which are subject to the provisions of section 56-265, Idaho Code. The provisions of this section are applicable to all other facilities. The property rental rate includes compensation for major movable equipment but not for minor movable equipment. The property rental rate is paid in lieu of payment for amortization, depreciation, and interest for financing the cost of land and depreciable assets. Prior to final audit, the director shall determine an interim rate that approximates the property rental rate. The property rental rate shall be determined as follows:

Except as determined pursuant to this section:

“Property base” = $9.24 for all facilities.

“Change in building costs” = 1.0 from April 1, 1985, through December 31, 1985. Thereafter “Change in building costs” will be adjusted for each calendar year to reflect the reported annual change in the building cost index for a class D building in the western region, as of September of the prior year, published by the Marshall Swift Valuation Service. However, for freestanding skilled care facilities “change in building costs” = 1.145 from July 1, 1991, through December 31, 1991. Thereafter, change in building costs for freestanding skilled care facilities will be adjusted each calendar year to reflect the reported annual change in the building cost index for a class D building in the western region, as of September of the prior year as published by the Marshall Swift Valuation Service or the consumer price index for renter’s costs available in September of the prior year, whichever is greater.

“Age of facility” = the director shall determine the effective age, in years, of the facility by subtracting the year in which the facility, or portion thereof, was constructed from the year in which the rate is to be applied. No facility or portion thereof shall be assigned an age of more than thirty (30) years. However, beginning July 1, 1991, for freestanding skilled care facilities, “age of facility” will be a revised age which is the lesser of the age established under other provisions of this section or the age which most closely yields the rate allowable to existing facilities as of June 30, 1991, under subsection (1) of this section. This revised age shall not increase over time.

If adequate information is not submitted by the facility to document that the facility, or portion thereof, is newer than thirty (30) years, the director shall set the effective age at thirty (30) years. Adequate documentation shall include, but not be limited to, such documents as copies of building permits, tax assessors’ records, receipts, invoices, building contracts, and original notes of indebtedness. The director shall compute an appropriate age for facilities when documentation is provided to reflect expenditures for building expansion or remodeling prior to the effective date of this section. The computation shall decrease the age of a facility by an amount consistent with the expenditure and the square footage impacted and shall be calculated as follows:
1. Determine, according to indexes published by the Marshall Swift Valuation Service, the construction cost per square foot of an average class D convalescent hospital in the western region for the year in which the expansion or renovation was completed.

The director shall adjust the effective age of a facility when major repairs, replacement, remodeling or renovation initiated after April 1, 1985, would result in a change in age of at least one (1) year. Such changes shall not increase the allowable property rental rate by more than three-fourths (3/4) of the difference between the adjusted property base determined in subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section and the rental rate paid to the facility at the time of completion of such changes but before the change component has been added to said rate. The adjusted effective age of the facility will be used in future age determinations, unless modified by provisions of this chapter.

The director shall allow for future adjustments to the effective age of a facility or its rate to reimburse an appropriate amount for property expenditures resulting from new requirements imposed by state or federal agencies. The director shall, within twelve (12) months of verification of expenditure, reimburse the medicaid share of the entire cost of such new requirements as a one-time payment if the incurred cost for a facility is less than one hundred dollars ($100) per bed.

At no time shall the property rental rate, established under subsection (1) of this section, be less than that allowed in subsection (1)(c)(ii), with the rate in effect December 31, 1988, being the base. However, subsequent to the application of this paragraph, before any rate increase may be paid, it must first be offset by any rate decrease that would have been realized if the provisions of this paragraph had not been in effect.

A “grandfathered rate” for existing facilities will be determined by dividing the audited allowable annual property costs, exclusive of taxes and insurance, for assets on hand as of January 1, 1985, by the total patient days in the period July 1, 1984, through June 30, 1985. The property rental rate will be the greater of the amount determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or the grandfathered rate. The director shall adjust the grandfathered rate of a facility to compensate the owner for the cost of major repairs, replacement, expansion, remodeling and renovation initiated prior to April 1, 1985, and completed after January 1, 1985, but completed no later than December 31, 1985. For facilities receiving a grandfathered rate making major repairs, replacement, expansion, remodeling or renovation, initiated after January 1, 1986, the director shall compare the grandfathered rate of the facility to the actual depreciation, amortization, and interest for the current audit period plus the per diem of the recognized cost of major repairs, replacement, expansion, remodeling or renovation, amortized over the American hospital association guideline component useful life. The greater of the two (2) numbers will be allowed as the grandfathered rate. Such changes shall not increase the allowable grandfathered rate by more than three-fourths (3/4) of the difference between the current grandfathered rate and the adjusted property base determined in subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The property rental rate per day of care paid to facilities with leases signed prior to March 30, 1981, will be the sum of the annualized allowed lease costs and the other annualized property costs for assets on hand as of January 1, 1985, exclusive of taxes and insurance when paid separately, divided by total patient days in the period June 30, 1983, through July 1, 1984. Effective July 1, 1989, the director shall adjust the property rental rate of a leased skilled facility under this paragraph to compensate for the cost of major repairs, replacement, expansion, remodeling and renovation initiated after January 1, 1985, by adding the per diem of the recognized cost of such expenditures amortized over the American hospital association guideline component useful life. Such addition shall not increase the allowable property rental rate by more than three-fourths (3/4) of the difference between the current property rental rate and the adjusted property base as determined in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of this section. Where such leases contain provisions that bind the lessee to accept an increased rate, reimbursement shall be at a rate per day of care which reflects the increase in the lease rate. Where such leases bind the lessee to the lease and allow the rate to be renegotiated, reimbursement shall be at a rate per day of care which reflects an annual increase in the lease rate not to exceed the increase in the consumer price index for renters costs. After the effective date of this subsection, if such a lease is terminated or if the lease allows the lessee the option to terminate other than by purchase of the facility, the property rental rate shall become the amount determined by the formula in subsection (1) of this section as of the date on which the lease is or could be terminated.

Property rental rate = (“Property base”) x (“Change in building costs”) x

(40 /ms “Age of facility”)

40

where:

2. Multiply the total square footage of the building following the expansion or renovation by the cost per square foot to establish the estimated replacement cost of the building at that time.

3. The age of the building at the time of construction shall be multiplied by the quotient of total actual renovation or remodeling costs divided by replacement cost. If this number is equal to or greater than 2.0, the age of the building in years will be reduced by this number, rounded to the nearest whole number. In no case will the age be less than zero (0).

(4)(a) In the event of a sale, the buyer shall receive the property rental rate as provided in subsection (1) of this section, except under the conditions of paragraph (b) of this subsection or except in the event of the first sale for a freestanding skilled care facility receiving a grandfathered rate after June 30, 1991, whereupon the new owner shall receive the same rate that the seller would have received at any given point in time.

(b) In the event of a forced sale of a facility where the seller has been receiving a grandfathered rate, the buyer will receive a rate based upon his incurred property costs, exclusive of taxes and insurance, for the twelve (12) months following the sale, divided by the facility’s total patient days for that period, or the property rental rate, whichever is higher, but not exceeding the rate that would be due the seller.

§ 56-109. Property rental rate implementation schedule. [Repealed.]